Nebraska, session 109, LB45.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB45 LB45
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-622.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
48-622.02 (1) The Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund is
created. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. No
expenditures shall be made from the Nebraska Training and Support Cash
Fund without the written authorization of the Governor upon the
recommendation of the commissioner. Transfers may be made from the fund
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any interest
earned on money in the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund shall be
credited to the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund.
(2) Money in the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund shall be
used for (a) administrative costs of establishing, assessing, collecting,
and maintaining state unemployment insurance tax liability and payments,
(b) administrative costs of creating, operating, maintaining, and
dissolving the State Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund and the Nebraska
Training and Support Cash Fund, (c) support of public and private job
training programs designed to train, retrain, or upgrade work skills of
existing Nebraska workers of for-profit and not-for-profit businesses,
(d) recruitment of workers to Nebraska, (e) training new employees of
expanding Nebraska businesses, (f) retention of existing employees of
Nebraska businesses, (g) the costs of creating a common web portal for
the attraction of businesses and workers to Nebraska, (h) developing and
conducting labor availability and skills gap studies pursuant to the
Sector Partnership Program Act, for which money may be transferred to the
Sector Partnership Program Fund as directed by the Legislature, and (i)
payment of unemployment insurance benefits if solvency of the state's
account in the Unemployment Trust Fund and of the State Unemployment
Insurance Trust Fund so require, and (j) awarding grants under section 3
of this act.
-2-

LB45 LB45
2025 2025
(3) The Administrative Costs Reserve Account is created within the
Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund. Money shall be allocated from
the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund to the Administrative Costs
Reserve Account in amounts sufficient to pay the anticipated
administrative costs identified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund to the Sector
Partnership Program Fund no later than July 15, 2016.
Sec. 2. Section 48-622.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-622.03 (1) There is hereby created the Nebraska Worker Training
Board. The board shall consist of seven members appointed and serving for
terms determined by the Governor as follows:
(a) A representative of employers in Nebraska;
(b) A representative of employees in Nebraska;
(c) A representative of the public;
(d) The Commissioner of Labor or a designee;
(e) The Director of Economic Development or a designee;
(f) The Commissioner of Education or a designee; and
(g) The chairperson of the governing board of the Nebraska Community
College Association or a designee.
(2) The chairperson of the Nebraska Worker Training Board shall be
the representative of the employers in Nebraska.
(3) By July 1 of each year, the board shall prepare an annual
program plan for the upcoming fiscal year containing guidelines for the
program under subdivisions (2)(c) through (f) of section 48-622.02
financed by the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund. The guidelines
shall include, but not be limited to, guidelines for certifying training
providers, criteria for evaluating requests for the use of money under
subdivisions (2)(c) through (f) of section 48-622.02, and guidelines for
requiring employers to provide matching funds. The guidelines shall give
-3-

LB45 LB45
2025 2025
priority to training that contributes to the expansion of the Nebraska
workforce and increasing the pool of highly skilled workers in Nebraska.
(4) By December 31 of each year, the Department of Labor shall
provide a report to the Governor covering the activities of such the
program financed by the Nebraska Training and Support Cash Fund for the
previous fiscal year. The report shall contain an assessment of the
effectiveness of the program and its administration.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section, historically underserved
youth means a person who is eighteen years of age or younger and who has
experienced homelessness, is from a low-income family or resides in a
poverty area as determined by the department, has been involved in foster
care or the juvenile justice system, is at risk of dropping out of
school, or resides in a qualified census tract as defined in 26 U.S.C.
42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Department of Labor shall establish a five-year pilot grant
program to provide grants to any entity that meets the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section subject to the amount appropriated for
this purpose. The department shall implement an initial pilot phase in a
city of the metropolitan class, a city of the primary class, and two
rural communities, allowing for assessment of program efficacy,
challenges, and resource requirements before statewide expansion.
Following the pilot phase, the department shall compile a comprehensive
evaluation report outlining successes, obstacles, and recommended program
modifications. The statewide program shall then be expanded based on
these findings to maximize impact. The department may establish a
regional distribution mechanism to ensure equitable access to grants by
applicants from various regions of the state. If the appropriation is not
sufficient to award grants to all eligible applicants, the grants shall
be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis and priority shall be
given to grant recipients operating in census tracts with the highest
poverty rates, lowest employment rates, or greatest need as determined by
-4-

LB45 LB45
2025 2025
the department.
(3) The purpose of the program is to provide job training,
employment, and mentorship opportunities to historically underserved
youth in urban areas as determined by the department. The program shall
aim to provide historically underserved youth with skills that lead to a
certification or qualifications for high-demand fields, including, but
not limited to, information technology, health care, and skilled trades.
The department shall report on placement rates within these fields in the
report required by this section.
(4) In order to be eligible to apply for a grant, an entity shall:
(a) Have its headquarters in a qualified census tract as defined in
26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2025;
(b) Demonstrate to the department that it is committed to hiring
historically underserved youth. Commitment to hiring historically
underserved youth shall be demonstrated through structured job training
or employment programs with clear timelines, resources, and personnel
dedicated to supporting historically underserved youth; and
(c) Demonstrate to the department that it is committed to reach
historically underserved youth to create safety and stability for the
youth and the community.
(5) An applicant shall demonstrate in the application to the
satisfaction of the department that the applicant has the ability to
provide job training, competitive wages, mentorship initiatives, and any
other resources necessary to support employment and social wellness
development for historically underserved youth and that the job training
will provide practical skills and valuable work experience.
(6) As a condition of acceptance of the grant, the grant recipient
shall provide a report annually to the department that states the number
of historically underserved youth employed with grant funds in the past
calendar year, the specific expenditures of the grant funds during such
time, and the plan to use any unexpended funds. The report shall include
-5-

LB45 LB45
2025 2025
evidence of skill attainment, such as an industry-recognized
certification, within six months after youth program completion, if
applicable. Each grant recipient shall track and report on metrics,
including youth job retention rates, wage progression over time, and the
number of youth who transition to higher-skilled roles or pursue further
education after completing the program offered by the grant recipient.
(7) A grant recipient is encouraged to create partnerships with
employers or educational institutions that commit to offering
internships, apprenticeships, or job placements upon completion of the
program offered by the grant recipient. If available, the department may
award additional grant funds to grant recipients that partner with local
businesses, educational institutions, or workforce development agencies
to expand training and mentorship opportunities. The department shall
review the reports prior to awarding any future grants to make sure that
the grant funds are used appropriately and to measure the effectiveness
and impact of the grant program. Following the submission of annual
reports, the department shall provide feedback to each grant recipient,
highlighting areas of strength and areas for potential improvement based
on program performance data. The department shall compile an annual
report of best practices from high-performing grant recipients and
distribute this to all grant recipients to enhance program quality.
The department shall annually evaluate program impact, assessing
youth employment outcomes, long-term job retention, and economic
advancement for historically underserved youth.
(8) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate twenty
million dollars for fiscal year 2025-26 and every fiscal year thereafter
to the Department of Labor from the Nebraska Training and Support Cash
Fund for the purposes of awarding grants under this section. The
department shall use no more than one percent of the appropriation for
administration of the grants. Administrative costs shall be limited to
expenses directly related to grant program oversight, including personnel
-6-

LB45 LB45
2025 2025
for application review, program auditing, and data management. No portion
of administrative costs shall be allocated for unrelated departmental
expenses. The department shall publish an annual report detailing
administrative expenditures, ensuring transparency in the management of
allocated funds.
Sec. 4. Original section 48-622.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 48-622.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-7-